Tennessee, session 114, SB1658.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-402, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(1) and substituting:
(1)
(A) The court shall enhance a person's sentence by a mandatory
minimum period of incarceration of thirty (30) days if a person is convicted of a
violation of § 55-10-401, and at the time of the offense the person was:
(i) Accompanied by a child under eighteen (18) years of age; or
(ii) Within a marked school zone and a warning flasher or flashers
were in operation.
(B) The incarceration enhancement in this subdivision (b)(1) must be
served in addition to any period of incarceration received for the violation of § 55-
10-401.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
SB1658
009344
- 1 -